Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0285.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7. (1) Marriages A marriage may be solemnized by any of the following: (a) A district court judge, of the district court, anywhere in this state. (b) A district court magistrate, anywhere in this state. (c) A municipal judge, in the city in which the judge is serving or in a township over which a municipal court has jurisdiction under section 9928 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.9928. (d) A probate judge, of probate, anywhere in this state. (e) A judge of a federal court. (f) A mayor of a city, anywhere in a county in which that city is located. (g) A supervisor of a township in the county in which that township is located. (h) (g) A county clerk in the county in which the clerk serves, or in another county with the written authorization of the clerk of the other county. (i) (h) For a county having with a population of more than 1,500,000, inhabitants, an employee of the county clerk's office designated by the county clerk, in the county in which the clerk serves. (j) (i) A minister of the gospel or cleric or religious practitioner, anywhere in this state, if the minister or cleric or religious practitioner is ordained or authorized to solemnize marriages according to the usages of the denomination. (k) (j) A minister of the gospel or cleric or religious practitioner, anywhere in this state, if the minister or cleric or religious practitioner is not a resident of this state but is authorized to solemnize marriages under the laws of the state in which the minister or cleric or religious practitioner resides. (l) A civil celebrant. (m) A state legislator. (2) A person An individual authorized by this act to solemnize a marriage shall keep proper records and return licenses and certificates as required by section 4 of 1887 PA 128, MCL 551.104. (3) If a mayor of a city solemnizes a marriage, the mayor shall charge and collect a fee to be determined by the council of that city , which shall that must be paid to the city treasurer and deposited in the general fund of the city at the end of the month. (4) If the county clerk or, in a county having with a population of more than 1,500,000, inhabitants, an employee of the county clerk's office designated by the county clerk solemnizes a marriage, the county clerk shall charge and collect a fee to be determined by the commissioners of the county in which the clerk serves. The fee shall must be paid to the treasurer for the county in which the clerk serves and deposited in the general fund of that county at the end of the month. (5) As used in this section, "civil celebrant" means an individual to whom both of the following apply: (a) The individual is at least 18 years of age. (b) The individual works in accordance with the wishes of the client couple. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 286 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.